Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4006.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 204b. A zoning ordinance adopted under this act must not prohibit the use of a barn or other facilities located on land zoned for agricultural purposes as a commercial venue for weddings or similar events. This section does not prohibit the regulation of noise, advertising, traffic, hours of operation, or other conditions that may accompany the use of the facilities or land under this section. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law.